Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 2.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201086-164
Telecommunications carrier; placement
of line, wire, or cable across railroad right-of-way; application; petition;
hearing; order; standard crossing fee; expenses; agreement.

(1) Any telecommunications
carrier that intends to place a line, wire, or cable across a railroad right-of-way
shall request permission for such placement from the railroad carrier. The
request shall be in the form of a completed crossing application, including
engineering specifications. Upon receipt of such application, the railroad
carrier and the telecommunications carrier may enter into a binding wire-crossing
agreement. If the railroad carrier and the telecommunications carrier are
unable to negotiate a binding wire-crossing agreement within sixty days after
receipt of the crossing application by the railroad carrier, either party
may submit a petition to the commission for a hearing on the disputed terms
and conditions of the purported wire-crossing agreement.

(2)(a) Unless
otherwise agreed to by all parties, the commission shall, after providing
proper notice, hold and complete such hearing within sixty days after receipt
of the petition. The commission shall issue an order of its decision within
thirty days after the hearing. In rendering its decision, the commission shall
consider whether the terms and conditions at issue are unreasonable or against
the public interest, taking into account safety, engineering, and access requirements
of the railroad carrier as such requirements are prescribed by the Federal
Railroad Administration and established rail industry standards.

(b) Upon issuance
of an order by the commission under subdivision (a) of this subsection, the
railroad carrier and the telecommunications carrier shall have fifteen days
after the date of issuance to file a conforming wire-crossing agreement with
the commission. The commission shall have fifteen days after the date of such
filing to approve or reject the agreement. If the commission does not issue
an approval or rejection of such agreement within the fifteen-day requirement,
the agreement shall be deemed approved. The commission may reject a wire-crossing
agreement if it finds that the agreement does not conform to the order issued
by the commission. If the commission enters such a finding, the parties shall
revise the agreement to comply with the commission's order and shall refile
the agreement to the commission for further review. If the commission does
not approve or reject the revised agreement within fifteen days after the
date of refiling, the agreement shall be deemed approved.

(3)(a) Except
as provided in subsection (4) of this section or as otherwise agreed to by
all parties, if a telecommunications carrier places a line, wire, or cable
across a railroad right-of-way pursuant to this section, it shall pay the
railroad carrier a one-time standard crossing fee of one thousand two hundred
fifty dollars for each applicable crossing. In addition to the standard crossing
fee, the telecommunications carrier shall reimburse the railroad carrier for
any actual flagging expenses associated with the placement of the line, wire,
or cable.

(b) The standard crossing fee shall be in lieu of any license fee
or any other fees or charges to reimburse the railroad carrier for any direct
expense incurred as a result of the placement of the line, wire, or cable.

(4) If a railroad
carrier or telecommunications carrier believes a special circumstance exists
for the placement of a line, wire, or cable across a railroad right-of-way,
the railroad carrier or telecommunications carrier may petition the commission
for additional requirements or for modification of the standard crossing fee
in its initial petition to the commission pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section. If the petition is filed with the request for additional requirements
or modification, the commission shall determine if a special circumstance
exists that necessitates additional requirements for such placement or a modification
of the standard crossing fee.

(5) This section applies to any telecommunications
carrier certified by the commission pursuant to section 86-128. This section
does not apply to any longitudinal encumbrance or any line, wire, or cable
within any public right-of-way and does not change, modify, or supersede any
rights or obligations created pursuant to sections 86-701 to 86-707.

(6)(a) A wire-crossing
agreement between a railroad carrier and a telecommunications carrier that
includes a provision, clause, covenant, or agreement contained in, collateral
to, or affecting such wire-crossing agreement that purports to indemnify,
defend, or hold harmless the railroad carrier from any liability for loss
or damage resulting from the negligence or willful and wanton misconduct of
the carrier or its agents, employees, or independent contractors who are directly
responsible to such carrier or has the effect of indemnifying, defending,
or holding harmless such carrier from the negligence or willful and wanton
misconduct of the carrier or its agents, employees, or independent contractors
who are directly responsible to the carrier is against the public policy of
this state and is unenforceable.

(b) Nothing in this section shall affect
a provision, clause, covenant, or agreement in which the telecommunications
carrier indemnifies, defends, or holds harmless a railroad carrier against
liability for loss or damage to the extent that the loss or damage results
from the negligence or willful and wanton misconduct of the telecommunications
carrier or its agents, employees, or independent contractors who are directly
responsible to the telecommunications carrier.

(7) For purposes of this
section:

(a) Railroad carrier has the same meaning as in section 75-402;
and

(b) Telecommunications carrier means a telecommunications common
carrier as defined in section 86-118 or a telecommunications contract carrier
as defined in section 86-120.

Laws 2010, LB181, § 2.
July 15, 2010